Utah statutes.
63J-1-213.   Appropriations from special funds or accounts -- Transfer by
proper official only.
Whenever appropriations are made from special funds, or a fund account, the
transfer of money from those funds, or accounts, to the General Fund or any
other fund for budgetary purposes shall be made by the proper state fiscal
officer.
